Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 21.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-2620
Agreements for laboratory tests; contents.

The Division of Public Health of the Department of Health and Human Services may enter into agreements, not exceeding one year in duration, with any other governmental agency relative to the provision of certain laboratory tests and services to the agency. Such services shall be provided as stipulated in the agreement and for such fee, either lump sum or by the item, as is mutually agreed upon and as complies with the provisions of section 71-2619. All laboratories performing human genetic testing for clinical diagnosis and treatment purposes shall be accredited by the College of American Pathologists or by any other national accrediting body or public agency which has requirements that are substantially equivalent to or more comprehensive than those of the college.

Laws 1973, LB 583, § 3;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 637;

Laws 2001, LB 432, § 11;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 553;

Laws 2008, LB928, § 21.
July 18, 2008